Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Recycled Material Content Products

45A.500.
Legislative findings.

It is the finding of the General Assembly that a necessary component of waste management must be to reduce the quantity of waste; that recycling reduces the quantity of solid waste and reduces the costs to the state and local governments for collecting, transporting, landfilling, or incinerating solid waste, reduces litter on roadsides and waterways, creates income producing opportunities, and conserves energy and raw materials. It is also the finding of the General Assembly that government makes purchases in large volumes which significantly affects the availability, variety, price, and consumer acceptance of the products and services purchased by government. The General Assembly further finds that by eliminating policies and practices which discriminate against government procuring recycled material content products as well as products and services compatible with recycled material content goods, and that by requiring government purchases of products which contain the maximum possible amount of recycled materials, the availability and variety of recycled material content products will increase and removal and recycling of materials from the solid waste stream will grow. Finally, the General Assembly finds that instituting policies and practices to stimulate the availability and use of recycled material content products will help educate business and individual consumers about the value of recycling as a component of a waste management policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.505.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

45A.500

to

45A.540

, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, “state agency” means any agency of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government which purchases goods or services through a centralized state purchasing agency or which is authorized to directly purchase goods and services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.510.
Nonrecyclable materials may be purchased, when.

Nothing in KRS

45A.500

to

45A.540

shall prohibit a state agency from purchasing goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing for which a recycled material content substitute is not available or when the state agency can justify specifications for goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing which cannot be met by recycled material content substitutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.515.
Discrimination against purchase of recycled materials prohibited.

Prior to the issuance of an invitation for bid pursuant to KRS

45A.080

or a request for proposal pursuant to KRS

45A.085

, the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Administrative Office of the Courts on behalf of their respective branches of state government shall review and revise specifications for the purchase of goods, supplies, equipment, material, and printing to:

Eliminate specifications that explicitly or indirectly discriminate against goods, supplies, equipment, material, and printing with recycled material content; and

Eliminate unnecessary specifications for goods, supplies, equipment, material, and printing when less expensive alternative specifications may be substituted without affecting the intended use of what is purchased.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.520.
Requirement of purchase of materials with minimum recycled content.

Every state agency shall when purchasing goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing require a minimum recycled material content for those goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing. The recycled material content shall be established by administrative regulations to be promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet by September 1, 1991. For those products which the United States Environmental Protection Agency has established minimum recycled content procurement guidelines promulgated pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall adopt, at a minimum, the recycled material content standards equal to those established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 54, effective February 26, 1991.

45A.523.
Report on procurement of products made from recovered materials.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet and any state agency which makes any purchase independent of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prepare a report by January 1 of each year to the General Assembly and the Governor on progress in procuring products made from recovered materials. The report shall include:

The recycled content percentages of the various products being purchased;

Relative costs of virgin and recycled products;

Sources of recycled products being purchased;

Types of performance tests conducted on recycled products, the results, and actual agency experience;

Organizations participating in cooperative purchasing and volumes of materials purchased; and

A list of products reviewed for changes in specifications relating to their minimum recycled content.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 60, effective February 26, 1991.

45A.525.
Recycled material content provisions to be applied to contractors with a state agency.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall require, to the extent practicable, every person entering into a contract with a state agency for building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing any public structures or buildings or other improvements to any public real property to use goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing necessary to fulfill the contract which meet the requirements for recycled material content as adopted pursuant to KRS

45A.520

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 55, effective February 26, 1991.

45A.530.
Recycled material content provisions to be applied to projects financed by bonds issued by state agency.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall require, to the extent practicable, that every project within Kentucky financed fifty percent (50%) or more by bonds issued by a state agency be undertaken with goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing which meet the requirements for recycled material content as adopted pursuant to KRS

45A.520

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 56, effective February 26, 1991.

45A.535.
Vendors to be informed.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Legislative Research Commission and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall, on behalf of their respective branches of state government inform all vendors offering goods, supplies, equipment, materials, and printing to state agencies of the requirements of KRS

45A.500

to

45A.540

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.540.
Purchase of materials with minimum recycled material content through central stores.

Every county, city, school district, and special district may purchase goods, supplies, equipment, material, and printing which meet the procurement standards for minimum recycled material content through the central stores branch of the Division of Material and Procurement Services in the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Counties, cities, school districts, and special districts which purchase goods, supplies, equipment, material, and printing which meet the procurement standards established pursuant to KRS

45A.520

for minimum recycled material content shall receive a fifty percent (50%) reduction in any administrative fee the central purchasing agency is authorized to charge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 367, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 57, effective February 26, 1991; 2000, ch. 5, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Cox, What May States Do About Out-of-State Waste in Light of Recent Supreme Court Decisions Applying the Dormant Commerce Clause? Kentucky As Case Study in the Waste Wars, 83 Ky. L.J. 551 (1994-95).